test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AYD_gt-norm.yaml
     káa.ayd+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: káa.ayd
     káa.ayd+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayda
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd
     káa.ayd+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.aydang
     káa.ayd+V+DIRECT+PAST: káa.aydan
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.aydaa
     káa.ayd+V+INDIRECT+PAST: káa.aydaan
     káa.ayd+V+RELATIVE: káa.ayds
     káa.ayd+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: káa.aydaas
     káa.ayd+V+NON_FACTIVE: káa.aydang
     káa.ayd+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: káa.aydaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.aydang
     káa.ayd+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.aydanggang
     káa.ayd+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: káa.aydangang
     káa.ayd+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.aydiinii
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.aydaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.aydaangaan
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: káa.aydäsaa
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: káa.aydäs
     káa.ayd+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: káa.aydäsaang
     káa.ayd+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: káa.aydäsga
     káa.ayd+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: káa.aydäsaas
     káa.ayd+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: káa.aydäsaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asa'áa
     káa.ayd+V+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asa'áang
     káa.ayd+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asaasdláa
     káa.ayd+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asaasdláang
     káa.ayd+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'uuj
     káa.ayd+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: káa.aydäsaa'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'us
     káa.ayd+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'ujaa
     káa.ayd+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'uujaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: káa.aydäsaa'us
     káa.ayd+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ahlanggang
     káa.ayd+V+CERTAIN+PAST: káa.ayd'ahlanggan
     káa.ayd+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'ahlanggiinii
     káa.ayd+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: káa.aydäsaa'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: káa.ayd'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: káa.aydaa'ahlang
     káa.ayd+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: káa.aydaa'ahlanggaa
     káa.ayd+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: káa.aydaa'ahlanggang
     káa.ayd+V+REFLEXIVE: káa.ayd'ahl
     káa.ayd+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: káa.aydäseehl
     káa.ayd+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: káa.ayd'uu
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'waa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'waa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'waang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: káa.ayd'wägan
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'aawaa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: káa.ayd'aawaan
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: káa.ayd'waas
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: káa.ayd'aawaas
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'waa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'aawaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.aydang'waa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.aydang'waang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: káa.aydang'waa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'wägiinii
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'wägaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'wägaangaan
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: káa.ayd'waaäsaa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: káa.ayd'waaäs
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waaäsaang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waaäsga
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waaäsaas
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'waaäsaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'waa'uuj
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'waa'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: káa.ayd'waaäsaa'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'waa'us
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'waa'ujaa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'waa'uujaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waaäsaa'us
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: káa.ayd'waa'ahlanggang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: káa.ayd'waa'ahlanggan
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'waa'ahlanggiinii
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waaäsaa'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: káa.ayd'waa'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'aawaa'ahlang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: káa.ayd'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: káa.ayd'aawaa'ahlanggang
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: káa.ayd'waa'ahl
     káa.ayd+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: káa.ayd'waaäseehl
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: káa.ayd'ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'angga
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'anggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: káa.ayd'anggan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'aangaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: káa.ayd'aangaan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: káa.ayd'ans
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: káa.ayd'aangaas
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'angang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'aangaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'anggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.aydang'anggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: káa.aydang'angang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'anggiinii
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'anggaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'anggaangaan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: káa.ayd'angäsaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: káa.ayd'angäs
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'angäsaang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'angäsga
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'angäsaas
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'angäsaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asaa'áng
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asaa'ánggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.aydang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'uuj
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: káa.ayd'angäsaa'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'us
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'ang'ujaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'ang'uujaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'angäsaa'us
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: káa.ayd'aang'ahlanggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: káa.ayd'aang'ahlanggan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'aang'ahlanggiinii
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: káa.ayd'angäsaa'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: káa.ayd'aang'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'aangaa'ahlang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: káa.ayd'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: káa.ayd'aangaa'ahlanggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: káa.ayd'aang'ahl
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: káa.ayd'angäseehl
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: káa.ayd'ang'uu
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'waa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'waa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'waang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: káa.ayd'ang'wägan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'ang'aawaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: káa.ayd'ang'aawaan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: káa.ayd'ang'waas
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: káa.ayd'ang'aawaas
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'ang'waa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'ang'aawaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.aydang'ang'waa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: káa.aydang'ang'waang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: káa.aydang'ang'waa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'ang'wägiinii
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'ang'wägaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'ang'wägaangaan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: káa.ayd'ang'waaäs
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsaang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsga
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsaas
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: káa.ayd'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'waa'uuj
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'waa'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'waa'us
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'ang'waa'ujaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsaa'us
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: káa.ayd'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: káa.ayd'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: káa.ayd'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: káa.ayd'ang'waa'ahlans
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: káa.ayd'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: káa.ayd'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     káa.ayd+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: káa.ayd'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
